Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-2,180
Procedure if shareholder dissatisfied
with payment or offer.

(MBCA
13.26) (a) A shareholder paid pursuant to section 21-2,178 who is dissatisfied
with the amount of the payment must notify the corporation in writing of that
shareholder's estimate of the fair value of the shares and demand payment
of that estimate plus interest, less any payment under section 21-2,178. A
shareholder offered payment under section 21-2,179 who is dissatisfied with
that offer must reject the offer and demand payment of the shareholder's stated
estimate of the fair value of the shares plus interest.

(b) A shareholder who fails
to notify the corporation in writing of that shareholder's demand to be paid
the shareholder's stated estimate of the fair value plus interest under subsection
(a) of this section within thirty days after receiving the corporation's payment
or offer of payment under section 21-2,178 or 21-2,179, respectively, waives
the right to demand payment under this section and shall be entitled only
to the payment made or offered pursuant to those respective sections.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 180.